Utah statutes.
26-23-3.   Violation of public health laws or orders unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any person, association, or corporation, and the officers thereof:

(1)  to willfully violate, disobey, or disregard the provisions of the public health laws or the terms of any lawful notice, order, standard, rule, or regulation issued thereunder; or

(2)  to fail to remove or abate from private property under the person's control at his own expense, within 48 hours, or such other reasonable time as the health authorities shall determine, after being ordered to do so by the health authorities, any nuisance, source of filth, cause of sickness, dead animal, health hazard, or sanitation violation within the jurisdiction and control of the department, whether the person, association, or corporation shall be the owner, tenant, or occupant of such property; provided, however, when any such condition is due to an act of God, it shall be removed at public expense; or

(3)  to pay, give, present, or otherwise convey to any officer or employee of the department any gift, remuneration or other consideration, directly or indirectly, which such officer or employee is forbidden to receive by the provisions of this chapter;

(4)  to fail to make or file reports required by law or rule of the department relating to the existence of disease or other facts and statistics relating to the public health.

